Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 1 Testamentary Additions to Trusts

53-12-100.
Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-101.
Making of testamentary additions to trusts.

A devise or bequest, the validity of which is determinable by the law of this state, may be made by a will to the trustee of a trust established or to be established by the testator or by the testator and some other person or by some other person, including a funded or unfunded life insurance trust, even if the settlor has reserved any or all rights of ownership of the insurance contracts, if the trust is identified in the testator’s will and its provisions are set forth in a written trust instrument, other than a will, executed before or concurrently with the execution of the testator’s will or in the valid last will of a person who has predeceased the testator, regardless of the existence, size, or character of the corpus of the trust and notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-20. The devise or bequest shall not be invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable or both or because the trust was amended after the execution of the will or after the death of the testator.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, the property so devised or bequeathed:

Shall not be deemed to be held under a testamentary trust of the testator but shall become a part of the trust to which it is devised or bequeathed; and

Shall be administered and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the trust instrument or will setting forth the terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto made before or after the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, a revocation or termination of the trust before the death of the testator shall cause the devise or bequest to lapse.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-102.
Limitations of duties and responsibilities of trustee.

The trustee of a trust established by the testator or others as provided in Code Section 53-12-101 shall not be required to inquire into or audit the actions of the executor of the testator’s estate or to make any claim against the executor unless specifically directed to do so by the settlor in the trust instrument. In the event that the trustee is authorized or directed by the settlor in the trust instrument to pay or advance any part or all of the trust property to the executor of the testator’s estate for the payment of debts, taxes, and expenses of administration of the testator’s estate, the trustee shall not be liable for the application of the trust property so paid or advanced and shall not be liable for any act done or omitted to be done by the executor with regard to the trust property.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-103.
Effect on prior and subsequent wills.

This part shall apply to all devises or bequests made in the will of a testator dying on or after May 31, 1968, whether the will is executed before or after such date. This part shall not invalidate a devise or bequest to a trustee made by a will executed prior to May 31, 1968, by a testator dying prior to such date.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.